Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.32
Person, defined.

Person means any natural or judicial person, including any individual, corporation, partnership, or association, any state, or political subdivision thereof, any interstate body, and any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States Government.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 34.